Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-212
Motion picture films; contracts for rental; deposits; waiver of rights void.

Any provision of a contract whereby a person, association or corporation, who has deposited or advanced money on a contract for the use or rental of motion picture films, reels, or views as personal property, waives any provision of section 36-211, is void.

Laws 1921, c. 196, § 2, p. 716;

C.S.1922, § 2469;

C.S.1929, § 36-213;

R.S.1943, § 36-212.